Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act, “state  agency” means every state
officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch or agency of the state govern-
ment, the costs of which are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS  291.232 to 291.260, and subject to section 5 of this
2019 Act and any rule that may be adopted by the Oregon Department  of Administrative
Services, any obligations incurred by a state agency on or after July 1, 2019, that do not ex-
ceed the level of expenditures authorized under ORS 291.232 to 291.260 or  otherwise author-
ized for the last quarter of the 2017-2019 biennium  are authorized, and necessary funds are
appropriated therefor, unless the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services determines
that the state agency’s expenditure level should be modified, based on pending legislation.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services by  rule shall specify the means
whereby funds expended pursuant to  subsection (1) of this section or section 5 of this 2019
Act are reconciled and charged to the state agency’s  2019-2021 legislatively approved budget
during the 2019-2021 biennium.
(3) All payments for debt service, certificates of participation and other financing agree-
ments are hereby authorized during the period commencing July 1, 2019.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2019 Act apply to a state agency for which no  budget
has become law on or before July 1, 2019.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) If there is no 2019-2021 legislatively adopted budget upon  final
adjournment of the regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly  against which any
expenditure authorized by section 2 (1) or 5 of this 2019  Act can be applied, the expenditure
shall be considered to have been made from funds appropriated to the Oregon  Department
of Administrative Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for which no budget has been adopted and for  which
no expenditure authority exists when the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(c) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency Board of any expenditure made  under this subsection during the
2019-2021 biennium.
Enrolled House Bill 5048 (HB 5048-A) Page 1
(2)(a) If, after final adjournment of the regular session of the Eightieth  Legislative As-
sembly, the Governor vetoes  a legislatively adopted budget against which any expenditure
authorized by section 2 (1) or  5 of this 2019 Act can be applied, the expenditure shall be
considered to  have been made from funds appropriated to the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for  which a legislatively adopted budget has been
vetoed and for which no expenditure authority exists when the Governor vetoes the budget.
(c) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency Board of any  expenditure made under this subsection during the
2019-2021 biennium.
SECTION 5. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260 and section 2 of this 2019 Act,
and subject to any rule that may  be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, any obligations incurred by the Department of Human Services  on or after July 1,
2019, that do not exceed the level of expenditures authorized under ORS 291.232  to 291.260
or otherwise authorized for the seventh quarter of the 2017-2019 biennium are  authorized,
and necessary funds are  appropriated therefor, unless the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services determines that the expenditure level for the Department of Human Services
should be modified, based on pending legislation.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260 and section 2  of this 2019 Act, and subject to
any rule that may be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, any
obligations incurred by the Oregon Health Authority on or after  July 1, 2019, that do not
exceed the level of expenditures authorized  under ORS 291.232 to 291.260 or otherwise au-
thorized for the sixth quarter of the 2017-2019 biennium are  authorized, and necessary funds
are appropriated therefor, unless the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services deter-
mines that the expenditure level for the  Oregon Health Authority should be modified, based
on pending legislation.
SECTION 6.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2019 Act are repealed on September 15, 2019.
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5048 (HB 5048-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5048 (HB 5048-A) Page 3